algorithms/greek/stem_Unicode.sbl
  define steps8 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{a}{k}{y}' '{a}{k}{y}{a}' '{y}{t}{s}{a}' '{y}{t}{s}{a}{s}' '{y}{t}{s}{e}{s}' '{y}{t}{s}{oo}{n}' '{a}{r}{a}{k}{y}' '{a}{r}{a}{k}{y}{a}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{v}{a}{m}{v}' '{v}{r}' '{k}{a}{y}{m}' '{k}{o}{n}' '{k}{o}{r}' '{l}{a}{v}{r}' '{l}{o}{u}{l}' '{m}{e}{r}' '{m}{o}{u}{s}{t}'
          '{n}{a}{g}{k}{a}{s}' '{p}{l}' '{r}' '{r}{u}' '{s}' '{s}{k}' '{s}{o}{k}' '{s}{p}{a}{n}' '{t}{z}' '{f}{a}{r}{m}' '{ch}' '{k}{a}{p}{a}{k}'
          '{a}{l}{y}{s}{f}' '{a}{m}{v}{r}' '{a}{n}{th}{r}' '{k}' '{f}{u}{l}' '{k}{a}{t}{r}{a}{p}' '{k}{l}{y}{m}' '{m}{a}{l}' '{s}{l}{o}{v}' '{f}'
          '{s}{f}' '{t}{s}{e}{ch}{o}{s}{l}{o}{v}'
           (-> s <- '{a}{k}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{v}' '{v}{a}{l}' '{g}{y}{a}{n}' '{g}{l}' '{z}' '{i}{g}{o}{u}{m}{e}{n}' '{k}{a}{r}{d}' '{k}{o}{n}' '{m}{a}{k}{r}{u}{n}' '{n}{u}{f}'
          '{p}{a}{t}{e}{r}' '{p}' '{s}{k}' '{t}{o}{s}' '{t}{r}{y}{p}{o}{l}'
          (-> s <- '{y}{t}{s}' insert s)
        )) or
        (['{k}{o}{r}'] -> s <- '{y}{z}' insert s)
      )
    )
  )

  define steps9 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{d}{y}{o}' '{y}{d}{y}{a}' '{y}{d}{y}{oo}{n}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{a}{y}{f}{n}' '{y}{r}' '{o}{l}{o}' '{ps}{a}{l}' (-> s <- '{y}{d}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] among (
          '{e}' '{p}{a}{y}{ch}{n}' (-> s <- 'I{z}' insert s)
        ))
      )
    )
  )

  define steps10 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{s}{k}{o}{s}' '{y}{s}{k}{o}{u}' '{y}{s}{k}{o}' '{y}{s}{k}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        [substring] atlimit among (
         '{d}' '{y}{v}' '{m}{i}{n}' '{r}' '{f}{r}{a}{g}{k}' '{l}{u}{k}' '{o}{v}{e}{l}'
         (-> s <- '{y}{s}{k}' insert s)
        )
      )
    )
  )

  define step2a as (
    [substring] among (
      '{a}{d}{e}{s}' '{a}{d}{oo}{n}' (delete)
    )
    not ([substring] among (
      '{o}{k}' '{m}{a}{m}' '{m}{a}{n}' '{m}{p}{a}{m}{p}' '{p}{a}{t}{e}{r}' '{g}{y}{a}{g}{y}' '{n}{t}{a}{n}{t}' '{k}{u}{r}' '{th}{e}{y}' '{p}{e}{th}{e}{r}'
    ))
    insert '{a}{d}'
  )

  define step2b as (
    [substring] among (
      '{e}{d}{e}{s}' '{e}{d}{oo}{n}' (delete)
    )
    [substring] among (
      '{o}{p}' '{y}{p}' '{e}{m}{p}' '{u}{p}' '{g}{i}{p}' '{d}{a}{p}' '{k}{r}{a}{s}{p}' '{m}{y}{l}' (-> s <- '{e}{d}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step2c as (
    [substring] among (
      '{o}{u}{d}{e}{s}' '{o}{u}{d}{oo}{n}' (delete)
    )
    [substring] among (
      '{a}{r}{k}' '{k}{a}{l}{y}{a}{k}' '{p}{e}{t}{a}{l}' '{l}{y}{ch}' '{p}{l}{e}{x}' '{s}{k}' '{s}' '{f}{l}' '{f}{r}' '{v}{e}{l}' '{l}{o}{u}{l}' '{ch}{n}'
      '{s}{p}' '{t}{r}{a}{g}' '{f}{e}' (-> s <- '{o}{u}{d}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step2d as (
    [substring] among (
      '{e}{oo}{s}' '{e}{oo}{n}' (delete do unset test1)
    )
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{th}' '{d}' '{e}{l}' '{g}{a}{l}' '{n}' '{p}' '{y}{d}' '{p}{a}{r}' (-> s <- '{e}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step3 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{a}' '{y}{o}{u}' '{y}{oo}{n}' (delete do unset test1)
    )
    ([v] -> s <- '{y}' insert s)
  )

  define step4 as (
    [substring] among (
       '{y}{k}{a}' '{y}{k}{o}' '{y}{k}{o}{u}' '{y}{k}{oo}{n}' (delete do unset test1)
    )
    ([v] -> s <- '{y}{k}' insert s) or
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{a}{l}' '{a}{d}' '{e}{n}{d}' '{a}{m}{a}{n}' '{a}{m}{m}{o}{ch}{a}{l}' '{i}{th}' '{a}{n}{i}{th}' '{a}{n}{t}{y}{d}' '{f}{u}{s}' '{v}{r}{oo}{m}' '{g}{e}{r}'
      '{e}{x}{oo}{d}' '{k}{a}{l}{p}' '{k}{a}{l}{l}{y}{n}' '{k}{a}{t}{a}{d}' '{m}{o}{u}{l}' '{m}{p}{a}{n}' '{m}{p}{a}{g}{y}{a}{t}' '{m}{p}{o}{l}' '{m}{p}{o}{s}'
      '{n}{y}{t}' '{x}{y}{k}' '{s}{u}{n}{o}{m}{i}{l}' '{p}{e}{t}{s}' '{p}{y}{t}{s}' '{p}{y}{k}{a}{n}{t}' '{p}{l}{y}{a}{t}{s}' '{p}{o}{s}{t}{e}{l}{n}' '{p}{r}{oo}{t}{o}{d}'
      '{s}{e}{r}{t}' '{s}{u}{n}{a}{d}' '{t}{s}{a}{m}' '{u}{p}{o}{d}' '{f}{y}{l}{o}{n}' '{f}{u}{l}{o}{d}' '{ch}{a}{s}'
      (-> s <- '{y}{k}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5a as (
    do ('{a}{g}{a}{m}{e}' atlimit <- '{a}{g}{a}{m}')
    do (
      [substring] among (
        '{a}{g}{a}{m}{e}' '{i}{s}{a}{m}{e}' '{o}{u}{s}{a}{m}{e}' '{i}{k}{a}{m}{e}' '{i}{th}{i}{k}{a}{m}{e}' (delete do unset test1)
      )
    )
    ['{a}{m}{e}']
    delete
    do unset test1
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{a}{n}{a}{p}' '{a}{p}{o}{th}' '{a}{p}{o}{k}' '{a}{p}{o}{s}{t}' '{v}{o}{u}{v}' '{x}{e}{th}' '{o}{u}{l}' '{p}{e}{th}' '{p}{y}{k}{r}' '{p}{o}{t}' '{s}{y}{ch}' '{ch}'
      (-> s <- '{a}{m}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5b as (
    do (
      [substring] among (
        '{a}{g}{a}{n}{e}' '{i}{s}{a}{n}{e}' '{o}{u}{s}{a}{n}{e}' '{y}{o}{n}{t}{a}{n}{e}' '{y}{o}{t}{a}{n}{e}' '{y}{o}{u}{n}{t}{a}{n}{e}' '{o}{n}{t}{a}{n}{e}' '{o}{t}{a}{n}{e}'
        '{o}{u}{n}{t}{a}{n}{e}' '{i}{k}{a}{n}{e}' '{i}{th}{i}{k}{a}{n}{e}' (
          delete
          do unset test1
          [substring] atlimit among (
            '{t}{r}' '{t}{s}' (-> s <- '{a}{g}{a}{n}' insert s)
          )
        )
      )
    )
    ['{a}{n}{e}']
    delete
    do unset test1
    ([v2] -> s <- '{a}{n}' insert s) or
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{v}{e}{t}{e}{r}' '{v}{o}{u}{l}{k}' '{v}{r}{a}{ch}{m}' '{g}' '{d}{r}{a}{d}{o}{u}{m}'
      '{th}' '{k}{a}{l}{p}{o}{u}{z}' '{k}{a}{s}{t}{e}{l}' '{k}{o}{r}{m}{o}{r}' '{l}{a}{o}{p}{l}' '{m}{oo}{a}{m}{e}{th}'
      '{m}' '{m}{o}{u}{s}{o}{u}{l}{m}' '{n}' '{o}{u}{l}' '{p}' '{p}{e}{l}{e}{k}' '{p}{l}' '{p}{o}{l}{y}{s}'
      '{p}{o}{r}{t}{o}{l}' '{s}{a}{r}{a}{k}{a}{t}{s}' '{s}{o}{u}{l}{t}' '{t}{s}{a}{r}{l}{a}{t}' '{o}{r}{f}'
      '{t}{s}{y}{g}{g}' '{t}{s}{o}{p}' '{f}{oo}{t}{o}{s}{t}{e}{f}' '{ch}' '{ps}{u}{ch}{o}{p}{l}' '{a}{g}'
      '{g}{a}{l}' '{g}{e}{r}' '{d}{e}{k}' '{d}{y}{p}{l}' '{a}{m}{e}{r}{y}{k}{a}{n}' '{o}{u}{r}' '{p}{y}{th}'
      '{p}{o}{u}{r}{y}{t}' '{s}' '{z}{oo}{n}{t}' '{y}{k}' '{k}{a}{s}{t}' '{k}{o}{p}' '{l}{y}{ch}'
      '{l}{o}{u}{th}{i}{r}' '{m}{a}{y}{n}{t}' '{m}{e}{l}' '{s}{y}{g}' '{s}{p}' '{s}{t}{e}{g}' '{t}{r}{a}{g}'
      '{t}{s}{a}{g}' '{f}' '{e}{r}' '{a}{d}{a}{p}' '{a}{th}{y}{g}{g}' '{a}{m}{i}{ch}' '{a}{n}{y}{k}'
      '{a}{n}{o}{r}{g}' '{a}{p}{i}{g}' '{a}{p}{y}{th}' '{a}{t}{s}{y}{g}{g}' '{v}{a}{s}' '{v}{a}{s}{k}'
      '{v}{a}{th}{u}{g}{a}{l}' '{v}{y}{o}{m}{i}{ch}' '{v}{r}{a}{ch}{u}{k}' '{d}{y}{a}{t}' '{d}{y}{a}{f}' '{e}{n}{o}{r}{g}'
      '{th}{u}{s}' '{k}{a}{p}{n}{o}{v}{y}{o}{m}{i}{ch}' '{k}{a}{t}{a}{g}{a}{l}' '{k}{l}{y}{v}' '{k}{o}{y}{l}{a}{r}{f}'
      '{l}{y}{v}' '{m}{e}{g}{l}{o}{v}{y}{o}{m}{i}{ch}' '{m}{y}{k}{r}{o}{v}{y}{o}{m}{i}{ch}' '{n}{t}{a}{v}'
      '{x}{i}{r}{o}{k}{l}{y}{v}' '{o}{l}{y}{g}{o}{d}{a}{m}' '{o}{l}{o}{g}{a}{l}' '{p}{e}{n}{t}{a}{r}{f}' '{p}{e}{r}{i}{f}'
      '{p}{e}{r}{y}{t}{r}' '{p}{l}{a}{t}' '{p}{o}{l}{u}{d}{a}{p}' '{p}{o}{l}{u}{m}{i}{ch}' '{s}{t}{e}{f}' '{t}{a}{v}'
      '{t}{e}{t}' '{u}{p}{e}{r}{i}{f}' '{u}{p}{o}{k}{o}{p}' '{ch}{a}{m}{i}{l}{o}{d}{a}{p}' '{ps}{i}{l}{o}{t}{a}{v}'
      (-> s <- '{a}{n}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5c as (
    do (
      [substring] among (
        '{i}{s}{e}{t}{e}' (delete do unset test1)
      )
    )
    ['{e}{t}{e}']
    delete
    do unset test1
    ([v2] -> s <- '{e}{t}' insert s) or
    ([substring] among (
      '{o}{d}' '{a}{y}{r}' '{f}{o}{r}' '{t}{a}{th}' '{d}{y}{a}{th}' '{s}{ch}' '{e}{n}{d}' '{e}{u}{r}' '{t}{y}{th}' '{u}{p}{e}{r}{th}'
      '{r}{a}{th}' '{e}{n}{th}' '{r}{o}{th}' '{s}{th}' '{p}{u}{r}' '{a}{y}{n}' '{s}{u}{n}{d}' '{s}{u}{n}' '{s}{u}{n}{th}' '{ch}{oo}{r}'
      '{p}{o}{n}' '{v}{r}' '{k}{a}{th}' '{e}{u}{th}' '{e}{k}{th}' '{n}{e}{t}' '{r}{o}{n}' '{a}{r}{k}' '{v}{a}{r}' '{v}{o}{l}' '{oo}{f}{e}{l}'
      (-> s <- '{e}{t}' insert s)
    )) or
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{a}{v}{a}{r}' '{v}{e}{n}' '{e}{n}{a}{r}' '{a}{v}{r}' '{a}{d}' '{a}{th}' '{a}{n}' '{a}{p}{l}' '{v}{a}{r}{o}{n}' '{n}{t}{r}' '{s}{k}' '{k}{o}{p}'
      '{m}{p}{o}{r}' '{n}{y}{f}' '{p}{a}{g}' '{p}{a}{r}{a}{k}{a}{l}' '{s}{e}{r}{p}' '{s}{k}{e}{l}' '{s}{u}{r}{f}' '{t}{o}{k}' '{u}' '{d}' '{e}{m}'
      '{th}{a}{r}{r}' '{th}'
      (-> s <- '{e}{t}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5d as (
    [substring] among (
      '{o}{n}{t}{a}{s}' '{oo}{n}{t}{a}{s}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        (['{a}{r}{ch}'] atlimit -> s <- '{o}{n}{t}' insert s) or
        (['{k}{r}{e}'] -> s <- '{oo}{n}{t}' insert s)
      )
    )
  )

  define step5e as (
    [substring] among (
      '{o}{m}{a}{s}{t}{e}' '{y}{o}{m}{a}{s}{t}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        (['{o}{n}'] atlimit -> s <- '{o}{m}{a}{s}{t}' insert s)
      )
    )
  )

  define step5f as (
    do (
      ['{y}{e}{s}{t}{e}']
      delete
      do unset test1
      [substring] atlimit among (
        '{p}' '{a}{p}' '{s}{u}{m}{p}' '{a}{s}{u}{m}{p}' '{a}{k}{a}{t}{a}{p}' '{a}{m}{e}{t}{a}{m}{f}' (-> s <- '{y}{e}{s}{t}' insert s)
      )
    )
    ['{e}{s}{t}{e}']
    delete
    do unset test1
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{a}{l}' '{a}{r}' '{e}{k}{t}{e}{l}' '{z}' '{m}' '{x}' '{p}{a}{r}{a}{k}{a}{l}' '{p}{r}{o}' '{n}{y}{s}'
      (-> s <- '{y}{e}{s}{t}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5g as (
    do (
      [substring] among (
        '{i}{th}{i}{k}{a}' '{i}{th}{i}{k}{e}{s}' '{i}{th}{i}{k}{e}' (delete do unset test1)
      )
    )
    [substring] among (
      '{i}{k}{a}' '{i}{k}{e}{s}' '{i}{k}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ([substring] among (
           '{s}{k}{oo}{l}' '{s}{k}{o}{u}{l}' '{n}{a}{r}{th}' '{s}{f}' '{o}{th}' '{p}{y}{th}' (-> s <- '{i}{k}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
           '{d}{y}{a}{th}' '{th}' '{p}{a}{r}{a}{k}{a}{t}{a}{th}' '{p}{r}{o}{s}{th}' '{s}{u}{n}{th}' (-> s <- '{i}{k}' insert s)
        ))
      )
    )
  )

  define step5h as (
    [substring] among (
      '{o}{u}{s}{a}' '{o}{u}{s}{e}{s}' '{o}{u}{s}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ([substring] among (
          '{p}{o}{d}{a}{r}' '{v}{l}{e}{p}' '{p}{a}{n}{t}{a}{ch}' '{f}{r}{u}{d}' '{m}{a}{n}{t}{y}{l}' '{m}{a}{l}{l}' '{k}{u}{m}{a}{t}' '{l}{a}{ch}' '{l}{i}{g}'
          '{f}{a}{g}' '{o}{m}' '{p}{r}{oo}{t}' (-> s <- '{o}{u}{s}' insert s)

        )) or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{f}{a}{r}{m}{a}{k}' '{ch}{a}{d}' '{a}{g}{k}' '{a}{n}{a}{r}{r}' '{v}{r}{o}{m}' '{e}{k}{l}{y}{p}' '{l}{a}{m}{p}{y}{d}' '{l}{e}{ch}' '{m}' '{p}{a}{t}'
          '{r}' '{l}' '{m}{e}{d}' '{m}{e}{s}{a}{z}' '{u}{p}{o}{t}{e}{y}{n}' '{a}{m}' '{a}{y}{th}' '{a}{n}{i}{k}' '{d}{e}{s}{p}{o}{z}'
          '{e}{n}{d}{y}{a}{f}{e}{r}' '{d}{e}' '{d}{e}{u}{t}{e}{r}{e}{u}' '{k}{a}{th}{a}{r}{e}{u}' '{p}{l}{e}' '{t}{s}{a}'
          (-> s <- '{o}{u}{s}' insert s)
        ))
      )
    )
  )
